fst/morphology/stems/morph_derivation.lexc
LEXICON saskat-
saskat-/:saskat/ -aht2 "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/12 [0/145429]
saskat-/:saskat/ -am2 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/12 [1/145429]
saskat-/:saskat/ -ht1 "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/12 [1/145429]
saskat-/:saskat/ -htaw "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/12 [1/145429]
saskat-/:saskat/ -i "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/12 [1/145429]
saskat-/:saskat/ -êýi- "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/12 [0/145429]
saskat-/:saskat/ -êýiht "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/12 [0/145429]
saskat-/:saskat/ -êýim "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/12 [0/145429]
saskat-/:saskat/ -î "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/12 [1/145429]

LEXICON sasâk-
sasâk-/:sasâk/ -isî "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=2/2 [3/145429]

LEXICON sasîht-
sasîht-/:sasîht/ -wih "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/2 [1/145429]
sasîht-/:sasîht/ -êýiht "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]

LEXICON sasîp-
sasîp-/:sasîp/ -ht1 "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=3/7 [2/145429]
sasîp-/:sasîp/ -ht2 "weight: 19.561867" ; ! n=1/7 [12/145429]
sasîp-/:sasîp/ -htaw "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/7 [2/145429]
sasîp-/:sasîp/ -htawak- "weight: 27.641950" ; ! n=1/7 [0/145429]

LEXICON saw1-
saw1-/:saw/ -ohk- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/31 [2/145429]
saw1-/:saw/ -êýi- "weight: 14.774375" ; ! n=15/31 [96/145429]
saw1-/:saw/ -êýiht "weight: 19.561867" ; ! n=6/31 [2/145429]
saw1-/:saw/ -êýihtâkosi "weight: 18.218132" ; ! n=2/31 [23/145429]
saw1-/:saw/ -êýihtâkwan "weight: 25.146680" ; ! n=1/31 [0/145429]
saw1-/:saw/ -êýim "weight: 15.992335" ; ! n=6/31 [71/145429]

LEXICON saw2-
saw2-/:saw/ -ah1 "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
saw2-/:saw/ -ahk2- "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/5 [0/145429]
saw2-/:saw/ -ahp- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
saw2-/:saw/ -ahpinê "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]

LEXICON sawânak-
sawânak-/:sawânak/ -êýi- "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=14/28 [0/145429]
sawânak-/:sawânak/ -êýiht "weight: 30.009073" ; ! n=3/28 [0/145429]
sawânak-/:sawânak/ -êýim "weight: 28.709790" ; ! n=11/28 [0/145429]

LEXICON sihk-
sihk-/:sihk/ -aci "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]
sihk-/:sihk/ -at1- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]

LEXICON sihkihp-
sihkihp-/:sihkihp/ -im1 "weight: 26.630349" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]
sihkihp-+Der/N:sihkihp NA "weight: 18.262584" ; ! n=1/2 (NA-1) [44/145429]

LEXICON sihkos-
sihkos-+Der/N:sihkos NA "weight: 18.463255" ; ! n=1/1 (NA-1) [36/145429]

LEXICON sihkosiw-
sihkosiw-/:sihkosiw/ -wayân "weight: 19.051042" ; ! n=2/3 [10/145429]
sihkosiw-+Der/N:sihkosiw NA "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=1/3 (NA-2) [0/145429]

LEXICON sihkw-
sihkw-/:sihkw/ -i "weight: 19.002251" ; ! n=3/8 [7/145429]
sihkw-/:sihkw/ -âT "weight: 19.744189" ; ! n=2/8 [5/145429]
sihkw-/:sihkw/ -ât "weight: 26.831020" ; ! n=3/8 [0/145429]

LEXICON sihpw-
sihpw-/:sihpw/ -stah "weight: 30.009073" ; ! n=3/4 [0/145429]
sihpw-/:sihpw/ -stahw "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/4 [0/145429]

LEXICON siht-
siht-/:siht/ -akw "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/10 [0/145429]
siht-/:siht/ -isis "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/10 [0/145429]
siht-/:siht/ -isk- "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/10 [0/145429]
siht-/:siht/ -iskâ "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/10 [0/145429]
siht-+Der/N:siht NA "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/10 (NA-1) [0/145429]
@R.noun.Indep@siht-+Der/N:@R.noun.Indep@siht NA_SG/a_POSS/im "weight: 19.967332" ; ! n=4/10 (NA-4) [2/145429]

LEXICON sihtakw-
sihtakw-+Der/N:sihtakw NA "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 (NA-3) [0/145429]
sihtakw-+Der/N:sihtakw NI "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 (NI-3) [0/145429]

LEXICON sik-
sik-/:sik/ -i "weight: 27.370016" ; ! n=1/11 [0/145429]
sik-/:sik/ -i3 "weight: 17.461806" ; ! n=7/11 [14/145429]
sik-/:sik/ -iT "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=1/11 [6/145429]
sik-/:sik/ -it "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/11 [1/145429]

LEXICON sikat-
sikat-/:sikat/ -êýi- "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/4 [2/145429]
sikat-/:sikat/ -êýiht "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/4 [2/145429]
sikat-/:sikat/ -êýim "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/4 [0/145429]

LEXICON sikokahtâ-
sikokahtâ-+Der/N:sikokahtâ NI "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 (NI-1) [0/145429]
@R.class.AI@sikokahtâ-+Der/V:@R.class.AI@sikokahtâ VAI-ae "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 (VAI-1) [0/145429]

LEXICON sikw-
sikw-/:sikw/ -ah1 "weight: 19.849549" ; ! n=3/75 [3/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -aht2 "weight: 19.407717" ; ! n=7/75 [2/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -ahw1 "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -am2 "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -asin- "weight: 26.354096" ; ! n=2/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -asinah "weight: 26.354096" ; ! n=2/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -ask2- "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -atah "weight: 18.021422" ; ! n=8/75 [7/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -atahw "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -hkaS "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -hkahtê "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -hkas "weight: 26.354096" ; ! n=2/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -hkaso "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -hkasw "weight: 26.354096" ; ! n=2/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -hkoT "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -hkot "weight: 25.948630" ; ! n=3/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -ht- "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -htatâ "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -ikah "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -ikahw "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/75 [1/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -n1 "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/75 [1/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -paýi "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/75 [2/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -piT "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -pit "weight: 25.948630" ; ! n=3/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -poT "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -pot "weight: 25.437805" ; ! n=5/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -s1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/75 [1/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -sk1 "weight: 26.354096" ; ! n=2/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -skaw1 "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -sw1 "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -sâw- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/75 [1/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -sâwâT "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -sâwât "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/75 [1/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -â1 "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -âciw- "weight: 19.849549" ; ! n=3/75 [3/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -âciwahtê "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -âciwaso "weight: 27.047243" ; ! n=1/75 [0/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -âciwasw "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/75 [3/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ -âskw- "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=1/75 [4/145429]
sikw-/:sikw/ wêp- "weight: 25.948630" ; ! n=3/75 [0/145429]

LEXICON sikwat-
sikwat-/:sikwat/ -at2- "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/5 [0/145429]
sikwat-/:sikwat/ -ati2 "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
sikwat-/:sikwat/ -atin2 "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
sikwat-/:sikwat/ -paýi "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/5 [2/145429]

LEXICON sikwê-
sikwê-/:sikwê/ -hkw- "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/2 [0/145429]

LEXICON sikâkw-
sikâkw-/:sikâkw/ -is "weight: 19.407717" ; ! n=1/8 [14/145429]
sikâkw-/:sikâkw/ -min "weight: 27.323496" ; ! n=1/8 [0/145429]
sikâkw-/:sikâkw/ -mâ- "weight: 26.630349" ; ! n=2/8 [0/145429]
sikâkw-/:sikâkw/ -mâkosi "weight: 27.323496" ; ! n=1/8 [0/145429]
sikâkw-/:sikâkw/ -mâkwan "weight: 27.323496" ; ! n=1/8 [0/145429]
sikâkw-/:sikâkw/ -wayân "weight: 27.323496" ; ! n=1/8 [0/145429]
sikâkw-+Der/N:sikâkw NA "weight: 19.967332" ; ! n=1/8 (NA-3) [8/145429]

LEXICON Initials
0 saskat- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=9/27654 [4/145429]
0 sasâk- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [3/145429]
0 sasîht- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [1/145429]
0 sasîp- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=5/27654 [14/145429]
0 saw1- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=16/27654 [98/145429]
0 saw2- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=4/27654 [0/145429]
0 sawânak- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=14/27654 [0/145429]
0 sihk- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 sihkihp- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [44/145429]
0 sihkos- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [36/145429]
0 sihkosiw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=3/27654 [10/145429]
0 sihkw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=7/27654 [12/145429]
0 sihpw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=4/27654 [0/145429]
0 siht- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=3/27654 [1/145429]
0 sik- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=10/27654 [21/145429]
0 sikat- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [2/145429]
0 sikokahtâ- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [0/145429]
0 sikw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=64/27654 [24/145429]
0 sikwat- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=3/27654 [2/145429]
0 sikwê- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [0/145429]
0 sikâkw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=6/27654 [22/145429]
LEXICON mihkw-
mihkw-/:mihkw/ siht- "weight: 25.162265" ; ! n=1/127 [0/145429]
mihkw-/:mihkw/ sihtakw- "weight: 25.162265" ; ! n=1/127 [0/145429]
LEXICON o1-
o1-/:o/ sihkihp- "weight: 23.736196" ; ! n=1/251 [0/145429]
